Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-160
Administrative fine.

The commission may administratively fine pursuant to section 75-156 any person who violates the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 75-617;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 59.